Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-335 Unclaimed and withheld funds.
(a) All unclaimed funds subject to distribution remaining in the liquidator's
hands when the liquidator is ready to apply to the court for discharge,
including the amount distributable to any creditor, shareholder, member, or
other person who is unknown or cannot be found, shall be deposited with the
director of finance, and shall be paid without interest except in accordance
with section 431:15-332 to the person entitled thereto or the person's legal
representative upon proof satisfactory to the director of finance of the
person's right thereto. Any amount on deposit not claimed within six years
from the discharge of the liquidator shall be deemed to have been abandoned and
shall be escheated without formal escheat proceedings and be deposited with the
general fund.

(b) All funds withheld under section
431:15-327 and not distributed, shall upon discharge of the liquidator be
deposited with the compliance resolution
fund and paid by the liquidator in accordance with section 431:15-332. Any
sums remaining that under section 431:15-332 would revert to the undistributed
assets of the insurer shall be transferred to the compliance resolution fund and become the property of the State
under subsection (a), unless the commissioner in the commissioner's discretion
petitions the court to reopen the liquidation under section 431:15-337. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 163, §15; am L 2000, c 182, §14; am L 2002,
c 39, §16]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next